Utah statutes.
31A-2-404.   Duties of the commissioner and Title and Escrow Commission.
(1)  Notwithstanding the other provisions of this chapter, to the extent
provided in this part, the commissioner shall administer and enforce the
provisions in this title related to:
(a)  title insurance; and
(b)  escrow conducted by a title licensee or title insurer.
(2)  The commission shall:
(a)  in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking
Act, and subject to Subsection (3), make rules for the administration of the
provisions in this title related to title insurance including rules related
to:
(i)  rating standards and rating methods for title agencies and producers as
provided in Section 31A-19a-209;
(ii)  the licensing for a title licensee including the licensing requirements
of Sections 31A-23a-203 and 31A-23a-204;
(iii)  continuing education requirements of Section 31A-23a-202;
(iv)  examination procedures, after consultation with the department and the
department's test administrator when required by Section 31A-23a-204; and
(v)  standards of conduct for a title licensee;
(b)  concur in the issuance and renewal of licenses in accordance with Section
31A-23a-105 or 31A-26-203;
(c)  in accordance with Section 31A-3-103, establish, with the concurrence of
the department, all fees imposed by this title on a title licensee;
(d)  in accordance with Section 31A-23a-415 determine, after consulting with
the commissioner, the assessment on a title insurer as defined in Section 31A-
23a-415;
(e)  conduct all administrative hearings not delegated by the commission to an
administrative law judge related to the:
(i)  licensing of any applicant;
(ii)  conduct of any title licensee; or
(iii)  approval of continuing education programs required by Section 31A-
23a-202;
(f)  with the concurrence of the commissioner, approve assets that can be
included in a reserve fund required by Section 31A-23a-204;
(g)  with the concurrence of the commissioner, approve continuing education
programs required by Section 31A-23a-202;
(h)  with the concurrence of the commissioner, impose penalties:
(i)  under this title related to:
(A)  title insurance; or
(B)  escrow conducted by a title licensee;
(ii)  after investigation by the department in accordance with Part 3,
Procedures and Enforcement; and
(iii)  that are enforced by the commissioner;
(i)  advise the commissioner on the administration and enforcement of any
matters affecting the title insurance industry;
(j)  advise the commissioner on matters affecting the department's budget
related to title insurance; and
(k)  perform other duties as provided in this title.
(3)  The commission may make a rule under this title only if at the time the
commission files its proposed rule and rule analysis with the Division of
Administrative Rules in accordance with Section 63G-3-301, the commission
provides the Real Estate Commission that same information.
(4) (a)  The commissioner shall annually report the information described in
Subsection (4)(b) in writing to:
(i)  the commission; and
(ii)  the Business and Labor Interim Committee.
(b)  The information required to be reported under this Subsection (4):
(i)  may not identify a person; and
(ii)  shall include:
(A)  the number of complaints the department receives with regard to
transactions involving title insurance or a title licensee during the calendar
year immediately proceeding the report;
(B)  the type of complaints described in Subsection (4)(b)(ii)(A); and
(C)  for each complaint described in Subsection (4)(b)(ii)(A):
(I)  any action taken by the department with regard to the complaint; and
(II)  the time-period beginning the day on which a complaint is made and
ending the day on which the department determines it will take no further
action with regard to the complaint.
